Georgia, session 2025_26, HB471.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Article 1 of Chapter 7 of Title 31 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to
regulation of hospitals and related institutions, is amended by adding a new Code section to
read as follows:
"31-7-24.
(a) As used in this Code section, the term 'water safety education' shall have the same
meaning as set forth in Code Section 20-2-779.4.
H. B. 471
- 1 -

LC 57 0221
(b)(1) Within 24 hours of the birth of a newborn infant, a licensed general hospital or
birthing center shall make available to such newborn infant's parent or guardian a video
presentation on water safety education to be viewed onsite.
(2) Such hospital and birthing center shall provide such parent or guardian with a water
safety education form to be developed by the department. Such form shall be signed and
dated by the parent or guardian and shall include whether the parent or guardian viewed
the video presentation or refused to do so. Upon completion, such form shall be provided
to and maintained by the department.
(c) The department shall promulgate rules and regulations necessary to implement the
provisions of this Code section."
SECTION 2.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 471
- 2 -